Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1406
Ballot question committee, defined.

Ballot question committee shall mean any committee acting in support of, or in opposition to, the qualification, passage, or defeat of a ballot question but which does not receive contributions or make expenditures or contributions for the purpose of influencing or attempting to influence the action of the voters for or against the nomination or election of a candidate.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 6.